Utah statutes.
17-21-6.   General duties of recorder -- Records and indexes.

(1)  Each recorder shall:

(a)  keep an entry record, in which the recorder shall, upon acceptance and recording of any instrument, enter the instrument in the order of its recording, the names of the parties to the instrument, its date, the hour, the day of the month and the year of recording, and a brief description, and endorse upon each instrument a number corresponding with the number of the entry;

(b)  keep a grantors' index, in which the recorder shall index deeds and final judgments or decrees partitioning or affecting the title to or possession of real property, which shall show the entry number of the instrument, the name of each grantor in alphabetical order, the name of the grantee, the date of the instrument, the time of recording, the kind of instrument, the book and page, and a brief description;

(c)  keep a grantees' index, in which the recorder shall index deeds and final judgments or decrees partitioning or affecting the title to or possession of real property, which shall show the entry number of the instrument, the name of each grantee in alphabetical order, the name of the grantor, the date of the instrument, the time of recording, the kind of instrument, the book and page, and a brief description;

(d)  keep a mortgagors' index, in which the recorder shall enter all mortgages, deeds of trust, liens, and other instruments in the nature of an encumbrance upon real estate, which shall show the entry number of the instrument, the name of each mortgagor, debtor, or person charged with the encumbrance in alphabetical order, the name of the mortgagee, lien holder, creditor, or claimant, the date of the instrument, the time of recording, the instrument, consideration, the book and page, and a brief description;

(e)  keep a mortgagees' index, in which the recorder shall enter all mortgages, deeds of trust, liens, and other instruments in the nature of an encumbrance upon real estate, which shall show the entry number of the instrument, the name of each mortgagee, lien holder, creditor, or claimant, in alphabetical order, the name of the mortgagor or person charged with the encumbrance, the date of the instrument, the time of recording, the kind of instrument, the consideration, the book and page, and a brief description;

(f)  subject to Subsection (3), keep a tract index, which shall show by description every instrument recorded, the date and the kind of instrument, the time of recording, and the book and page and entry number;

(g)  keep an index of recorded maps, plats, and subdivisions;

(h)  keep an index of powers of attorney showing the date and time of recording, the book, the page, and the entry number;

(i)  keep a miscellaneous index, in which the recorder shall enter all instruments of a miscellaneous character not otherwise provided for in this section, showing the date of recording, the book, the page, the entry number, the kind of instrument, from, to, and the parties;

(j)  keep an index of judgments showing the judgment debtors, the judgment creditors, the amount of judgment, the date and time of recording, the satisfaction, and the book, the page, and the entry number; and

(k)  keep a general recording index in which the recorder shall index all executions and writs of attachment, and any other instruments not required by law to be spread upon the records, and in separate columns the recorder shall enter the names of the plaintiffs in the execution and the names of the defendants in the execution.

(2)  The recorder shall alphabetically arrange the indexes required by this section and keep a reverse index.

(3) (a)  The tract index required by Subsection (1)(f) shall be kept so that it shows a true chain of title to each tract or parcel, together with each encumbrance on the tract or parcel, according to the records of the office.

(b)  A recorder shall abstract an instrument in the tract index unless:

(i)  the instrument is required to contain a legal description under Section 17-21-20 or Section 57-3-105 and does not contain that legal description; or

(ii)  the instrument contains errors, omissions, or defects to the extent that the tract or parcel to which the instrument relates cannot be determined.

(c)  If a recorder abstracts an instrument in the tract index or another index required by this section, the recorder may:

(i)  use a tax parcel number;

(ii)  use a site address;

(iii)  reference to other instruments of record recited on the instrument; or

(iv)  reference another instrument that is recorded concurrently with the instrument.

(d)  A recorder is not required to go beyond the face of an instrument to determine the tract or parcel to which an instrument may relate.

(e)  A person may not bring an action against a recorder for injuries or damages suffered as a result of information contained in an instrument recorded in a tract index or other index that is required by this section despite errors, omissions, or defects in the instrument.

(f)  The fact that a recorded instrument described in Subsection (3)(e) is included in the tract index does not cure a failure to give public notice caused by an error, omission, or defect.

(g)  A document that is indexed in all or part of the indexes required by this section shall give constructive notice.

(4)  Nothing in this section prevents the recorder from using a single name index if that index includes all of the indexes required by this section.

